Utah statutes.
19-10-103.   Establishment of environmental institutional controls.

An owner of real property may, with the approval of the executive director, restrict the use of the real property by imposing on the real property appropriate environmental institutional controls to mitigate the risk posed to the public health, safety, or welfare, or the environment.

